Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3218.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 275.025, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Levy amount. The state general levy is levied against commercial-industrial property and seasonal residential recreational property, as defined in this section. The state general levy for commercial-industrial property is deleted text begin $716,990,000deleted text end new text begin $684,990,000new text end for taxes payable in deleted text begin 2023deleted text end new text begin 2026new text end and thereafter. The state general levy for seasonal-recreational property is $41,690,000 for taxes payable in 2020 and thereafter. The tax under this section is not treated as a local tax rate under section 469.177 and is not the levy of a governmental unit under chapters 276A and 473F. The commissioner shall increase or decrease the preliminary or final rate for a year as necessary to account for errors and tax base changes that affected a preliminary or final rate for either of the two preceding years. Adjustments are allowed to the extent that the necessary information is available to the commissioner at the time the rates for a year must be certified, and for the following reasons: (1) an erroneous report of taxable value by a local official; (2) an erroneous calculation by the commissioner; and (3) an increase or decrease in taxable value for commercial-industrial or seasonal residential recreational property reported to the commissioner under section 270C.85, subdivision 2, clause (4), for the same year. The commissioner may, but need not, make adjustments if the total difference in the tax levied for the year would be less than $100,000. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective beginning with property taxes payable in 2026 and thereafter. new text end